New Jersey, session 221, S3682.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In accordance with the commissions authority pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-34), the commission shall establish rules or regulations for the establishment of a list of self-excluded persons who are prohibited from entering a cannabis retailer or purchasing any cannabis item from such cannabis retailer.  Such rules shall include, but not be limited to: (1) establishing procedures for the placement on, and removal from, the list of self-excluded persons; (2) establishing procedures for the transmittal of the list of self-excluded persons to all cannabis retailers; and (3) requiring cannabis retailers to establish procedures designed to: (a) remove self-excluded persons from targeted mailings or other forms of advertising or promotions; and (b) deny self-excluded persons entry and access to the retail location and the cannabis items provided by the cannabis retailer. b.    Any person may request to be placed on the list by acknowledging, in the manner prescribed by the commission in accordance with subsection a. of this section, that the person wishes to be excluded and by agreeing that, during any period of voluntary exclusion, the person may not enter any cannabis retailer or purchase any cannabis item. c.     A cannabis retailer shall not allow entry to or serve any person who is on the self-exclusion list established pursuant to this section. d.    Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the list of self-excluded persons shall be exempt from public inspection, copying, and disclosure.  This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a cannabis retailer from disclosing the identity of a properly self-excluded person for the limited purpose of assisting in the proper administration of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2. This act shall take effect immediately.